Wisconsin, session 2025, SB22.
do enact as follows:SB22,11Section 1. 118.03 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:SB22,2,52118.03 (1) The school board shall adopt all the textbooks necessary for use in 3the schools under its charge. The school board shall file the list of the adopted 4books shall be filed textbooks with the school district clerk and shall post the list on 5the school board’s website.SB22,26Section 2. 118.03 (1m) of the statutes is created to read:SB22,2,127118.03 (1m) (a) Upon written request, a resident of a school district may 8inspect a copy of any textbook adopted under sub. (1) at a location designated by the 9school board for the public to access records under s. 19.34 and at no cost to the 10resident. The school board shall comply with a written request under this 11paragraph by no later than 14 days after the date on which the school board receives 12the written request.SB22,2,1513(b) A school board shall adopt procedures under which the school board is able 14to make available for inspection a copy of any textbook adopted under sub. (1) in 15fewer than 14 days.SB22,3,31(c) 1. This subsection may not be construed to require a school board to take 2any action that would constitute an infringement of copyright under the federal 3Copyright Act, 17 USC 101 to 1511.SB22,3,542. Nothing in this subsection limits a school district resident’s rights to access 5or copy records, as defined in s. 19.32 (2), under subch. II of ch. 19.SB22,36Section 3. 118.03 (4) of the statutes is amended to read:SB22,3,87118.03 (4) Any person violating this section sub. (1), (2), or (3) may be fined 8not less than $25 nor more than $100.SB22,49Section 4. 118.032 of the statutes is created to read:SB22,3,1110118.032 Curricula and instructional materials; inspection. (1) In this 11section:SB22,3,1412(a) “Curriculum” means a curriculum plan adopted by a school board to 13comply with a school board duty under s. 118.01 (2), 118.015, 118.017, 118.019, or 14121.02 (1) (c), (h), (k), (L), or (m).SB22,3,1615(b) “Instructional material” means any course content or resource included in 16a curriculum.SB22,3,2217(2) (a) Upon written request, a resident of a school district may inspect a copy 18of any curriculum or instructional material used in a school in the school district at 19a location designated by the school board for the public to access records under s. 2019.34 and at no cost to the resident. The school board shall comply with a written 21request under this paragraph by no later than 14 days after the date on which the 22school board receives the written request.SB22,4,223(b) A school board shall establish procedures under which the school board is 1able to make available for inspection a copy of any curriculum or instructional 2material used in a school under its charge in fewer than 14 days.SB22,4,53(c) 1. This subsection may not be construed to require a school board to take 4any action that would constitute an infringement of copyright under the federal 5Copyright Act, 17 USC 101 to 1511.SB22,4,762. Nothing in this subsection limits a school district resident’s rights to access 7or copy records, as defined in s. 19.32 (2), under subch. II of ch. 19.SB22,58Section 5. Initial applicability.SB22,4,119(1) This act first applies to textbooks adopted for use and curricula and 10instructional materials used in the school year beginning after the effective date of 11this subsection.SB22,4,1212